Maine, session 132, LD290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2602, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2003, c. 498, §6 and
affected by §12, is further amended to read:
4. Fines. Except as otherwise provided in this Title, fines and forfeitures collected
under this Title accrue to the General Fund, except that 15% of a fine collected under this
Title must be remitted to the municipality in which the violation or traffic infraction
occurred if the Uniform Summons and Complaint or the Violation Summons and
Complaint that resulted in the fine was issued by a municipal law enforcement agency and:
A. Six percent of fines and forfeitures collected for all traffic infractions, including
fines and forfeitures collected for traffic infractions under section 561‑A, accrues to
the Law Enforcement Agency Reimbursement Fund established in Title 4, section 173,
subsection 4‑B. This paragraph does not apply to sections 525, 1767 and 2363;
B. Of the fines and forfeitures collected for traffic infractions under sections 511, 2354,
2356, 2360, 2380, 2387 and 2388, 7% accrues to the General Fund, 6% accrues to the
Law Enforcement Agency Reimbursement Fund and the balance accrues to the General
Highway Fund; and
C. Of the fines and forfeitures collected for violations other than traffic infractions
under sections 511, 2354, 2356, 2360, 2380, 2387 and 2388, only $5 or 13%, whichever
is greater, accrues to the General Fund and the balance accrues to the Highway Fund.
The remaining balance of the fines collected under this Title, after the collection of fines
under this subsection, accrues to the General Fund.